District of Columbia statutes.
1-819.03

Issuance of regulations by Secretary.

The Secretary is authorized to issue regulations to implement, interpret, administer and carry out the purposes of this chapter, and, in the Secretary’s discretion, those regulations may have retroactive effect.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 730, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11093
renumbered as § 11083, Dec. 23, 2004, 118 Stat. 3966, Pub. L. 108-489, § 2(a)(1), (2)
2001 Ed., § 1-817.03.
1981 Ed., § 1-769.3.